Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-806
Declaration of purpose.

It is declared to be the purpose of sections 79-806 to 79-815 to provide more flexibility in the certification of qualified educators for Nebraska schools and not to decrease any requirements for certificates to teach, provide special services, and administer in Nebraska schools.

Laws 1963, c. 491, § 1, p. 1569;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1247.03;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 436;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 6.

Excellence in Teaching Act, see section 79-8,132.

This statute is merely declarative of the Legislature's purpose in enacting this series of statutes. It has been modified by deletion of part of section 79-1247.06, R.R.S.1943, which allowed completion of two years of a college program as the maximum requirement for teaching. State ex rel. Douglas v. Faith Baptist Church of Louisville, 207 Neb. 802, 301 N.W.2d 571 (1981).